California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
All revenues to be received by the department from pledged contracts shall be directly, concurrently and exclusively pledged to the payment of debentures, and all such revenues shall remain so pledged until all of the debentures are fully paid or sufficient funds have been accumulated and are legally available for the payment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.8.

All debenture redemption and interest payments and any premium payable upon debentures called for redemption, and all payments required for reserve funds, sinking funds and all other funds created as further security for the debentures constitute a first, direct, and exclusive charge and lien on all revenues of the pledged contracts and the interest or other income derived therefrom. Such revenues, together with any interest or other income earned thereon, and such funds and the interest and income earned thereon, constitute a trust fund for the security and payment of the debentures and shall not be used or pledged for any other purpose or transferred to any other fund as long as any such debentures are outstanding and unpaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.10.

There is in the State Treasury a revolving fund known as the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1970. Proceeds of sale of debentures shall be deposited in this fund. Money may be withdrawn from such fund in accordance with law upon requisition of the department for the purpose of carrying out the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.11.

There is in the State Treasury a special fund known as the Veterans’ Debenture Revenue Fund. All revenues shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Debenture Revenue Fund. All moneys deposited in the Veterans’ Debenture Revenue Fund shall be allocated and applied by the State Treasurer only as provided in the appropriate resolution of issuance of the department and separate and apart from all other moneys in the State Treasury. The moneys deposited in the Veterans’ Debenture Revenue Fund shall be segregated and applied as provided in the resolution of issuance. The resolution of issuance may provide for the creation of the Veterans’ Debenture Interest Fund Account, Veterans’ Debenture Principal Fund Account, Veterans’ Debenture Sinking Fund, Veterans’ Debenture Reserve Fund Account and also any other funds or accounts which will be deemed necessary or desirable for the payment of or further security of debentures. The resolution of issuance establishing such funds may provide for the manner and method of disbursement of such funds, the amounts to be deposited therewith and withdrawn therefrom, the application of any surplus moneys in any such funds to the purchase or redemption of debentures and for the investment of moneys in such funds in particular bonds or obligations which are then made eligible for such investments by the terms of such resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.12.

The State Controller is hereby authorized to make all necessary orders to provide for the establishment of special funds and accounts authorized by any resolution of issuance and for the transfer of moneys from the Veterans’ Debenture Revenue Fund into such account. Such transfer shall be made by the State Treasurer without further action on the part of the department. Neither the department nor the State of California nor any officer thereof shall have or exercise any rights with respect to the moneys in any of such funds or accounts so established save only in trust for the direct benefit of the holders of debentures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.13.

Prior to the issuance of any debentures the department is authorized to deposit in any reserve fund created for the further security of the debentures, as the initial deposit therein, cash or securities equal to the minimum amounts required to be maintained therein by any resolution of issuance. Excess money in the reserve fund or account not required to be maintained therein by the provisions of any resolution of issuance may be withdrawn at the request of the department and transferred to the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1970 and used and applied for the purpose of carrying out the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.14.

Debentures authorized under any resolution of issuance approved by the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee shall be sold by the State Treasurer upon the written request of the department at public or private sale, as determined by the department with the approval of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, and at those times and in those amounts that the department deems necessary to provide sufficient funds for the purposes for which the debentures are then authorized. Successive issues of debentures within the limits of the authorization for the issuance of debentures, if any of those limitations are included in the proceedings for the issuance of the debentures, shall be equally and regularly secured without preference, priority or distinction as to security or otherwise by reason of time of issue, or sale, except as debentures of various series may differ with respect to dates, numbers, interest rates, maturity, redemption provisions, sinking fund provisions, or otherwise as authorized in any resolution of issuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 287, Sec. 5.   Effective September 25, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.15.

In the event the State Treasurer shall determine to sell the debentures, all costs and expenses of publication of notice of sale shall be a charge against the department and shall be paid by the department. The department shall likewise pay the cost of printing, lithographing or otherwise preparing the debentures, the charges of any duly authorized agent of the State Treasurer appointed for the payment of principal and interest of the debentures in any place other than the office of the State Treasurer, any expenses incurred in connection with delivery of the debentures, including the fees and expenses of municipal bond attorneys whose opinion on the validity of the debentures is to be provided by the department without charge to the successful purchaser of the debentures. The department is authorized to employ any nationally known municipal bond attorney or attorneys and the Attorney General for the purpose of rendering legal opinions as to the validity of the debentures to be furnished to the purchaser of the debentures without cost. The department is also authorized to employ or appoint such independent financial consultants, attorneys, certified public accountants, public accountants, engineers or other independent consultants whose services or opinions are necessary or advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of revenue debentures. Payment for such services shall be made from the proceeds of the sale of the debentures or from any other funds available to the department on Controller’s warrant duly drawn for that purpose. Such expenses may also include the cost of delivering debentures at any place other than the office of the State Treasurer, including transportation and insurance costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.16.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, and in lieu of a pledge of revenues as security for any debentures issued pursuant to this chapter, the department may assign or pledge an undivided interest in the assets of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as security for the debentures. Undivided interest so assigned or pledged shall not exceed the amount of principal and interest of the debentures secured thereby, and shall be secondary and subordinate to any interest or right of the people and the holders of general obligation bonds in the fund under any general obligation veterans bond act.

(b) In that event, the department shall deposit the proceeds of the sale of the debentures and the revenues therefrom in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, and money may be withdrawn therefrom in accordance with law upon requisition of the department for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter and of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1943 and the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974. The department may create any accounts or funds within the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 and the Veterans’ Debenture Revenue Fund that may be appropriate or desirable for carrying out the provisions of this section.

(c) Further, in that event, and notwithstanding Section 1006.15, the interest rates on veterans’ purchase contracts shall be established as provided in Section 987.87.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 530, Sec. 10.   Effective September 17, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Issuance of Refunding Debentures [1004.1. - 1004.4.]

1004.1.

The department, subject to the approval of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding debentures for the purpose of redeeming or retiring any debentures issued under this chapter or any obligations issued by the state to finance programs of the department. All provisions of this chapter applicable to the issuance of debentures are applicable to the funding or refunding debentures and to the issuance, sale or exchange thereof. The department with the approval of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee may adopt a resolution or resolutions of issuance or supplemental resolutions authorizing the issuance of refunding debentures and fixing the terms and conditions thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 530, Sec. 11.   Effective September 17, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.2.

Refunding debentures may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all debentures or obligations to be refunded thereby and in addition to the payment of all expenses incident to the calling, retiring or paying of outstanding debentures or obligations and the issuance of refunding debentures. Those expenses include any amount necessary to be made available for the payment of interest upon refunding debentures from the date of sale thereof to the date of payment of the debentures or obligations to be refunded, or to the date upon which the debentures or obligations to be refunded will be paid pursuant to the call thereof or agreement with the holders thereof, and the premium, if any, necessary to be paid in order to call or retire the outstanding debentures or obligations and the interest accruing thereon to the date of the call or retirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 530, Sec. 12.   Effective September 17, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.3.

Refunding debentures shall not constitute a debt or obligation of the State of California but shall be debentures of the department of the same character and payable from the same funds as other debentures authorized pursuant to this chapter. Any and all reserve or other funds applicable to the payment of the debentures to be refunded may, if so directed by the department, be transferred to any reserve or other funds provided with respect to the refunding debentures. The pledge of revenues to be received from contracts entered into by the department with veterans shall not be lessened, diminished, or affected in any way by the issuance of such refunding debentures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.4.

The department may from time to time or at any time sell or exchange refunding debentures for the purpose of retiring, paying or refunding either all or part of the outstanding debentures or obligations, or of one or more series thereof, as it deems advisable. Refunding debentures may be issued and delivered as outstanding debentures or obligations to be refunded thereby, if the debentures are mature or are about to mature or are subject to call or redemption, or if the retirement thereof has been assured by consent of the holders thereof. Refunding debentures may be delivered in whole or in part in exchange for outstanding debentures or obligations with the consent of the holders thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 530, Sec. 13.   Effective September 17, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Remedies of Debenture Holders [1005.1. - 1005.6.]

1005.1.

The holder of any debenture may by mandamus or other appropriate proceedings compel the performance of any of the duties imposed upon any state official or employee or imposed upon the department or its officers, agents or employees with respect to the collection of revenues from pledged contracts entered into by the department with veterans, and the investment and disbursement of the proceeds received from the sale of debentures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.2.

The department may in any resolution of issuance define the events of default including among others default in the payment of the principal or interest upon or premium due upon any debentures or default by the department in the observance of any of the covenants, agreements or conditions on its part to be performed under the resolution of issuance and may provide that upon the happening of any such event of default the holders of not less than the majority in aggregate principal amount of the debentures at the time outstanding will be entitled to declare the principal of all of the debentures then outstanding and the interest accrued thereon to be immediately due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.4.

Whenever a bank or trust company is acting as trustee by reason of any default, or for the protection of the interests of the debenture holders, the bank or trust company as such trustee, shall take such action as the holders or registered owners of 20 percent in principal amount of all the debentures then outstanding shall request in writing, provided that the bank or trust company as such trustee may request reasonable security before taking any action so requested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.5.

No remedy conferred upon or reserved to the holders of debentures is intended to be exclusive of any other remedy or remedies now or hereafter provided by law and each and every such remedy shall be cumulative and shall be in addition to every other remedy given under this chapter or now or hereafter existing at law or in equity or by statute or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.6.

While any of the debentures remain outstanding the powers, duties or existence of the department and of every other official or agency of the State of California shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will adversely affect the interests and rights of the holders of the debentures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Miscellaneous [1006.1. - 1006.16.]

1006.1.

All debentures and the income therefrom are at all times exempt from taxation in the State of California, except for transfer, inheritance, and gift taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.2.

All debentures shall be legal investments for all trust funds, for the funds of all insurance companies, banks (both commercial and savings), trust companies, state school funds and any pension funds, public or private.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.3.

Any money or funds which may by law be invested in bonds of the State of California may be invested in debentures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.4.

Whenever any bonds of the State of California may by law be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public money, debentures may be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.5.

All debentures, subject to the provisions for registration contained therein, are negotiable instruments under the law merchant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.6.

The department may include in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of debentures any provisions not inconsistent with this chapter which limit, restrict or regulate the holding, deposit, investment, and application of money consisting of the proceeds from the sale of the debentures or the revenues or other income received from the pledged contracts entered into by the department with veterans, and such provisions shall constitute a contract with the holders of the debentures and shall be binding upon the department and all other officers, officials and agencies of the State of California and upon the state so long as any of the debentures are outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.7.

The department may provide in the proceedings authorizing issuance of debentures for the establishment of one or more reserve funds out of the proceeds of the sale of the debentures or out of revenues or out of any moneys or securities available to the department under this act, and may provide for the use and application of any surplus moneys in any such reserve fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.8.

The State Treasurer may sell any of the debentures authorized under this chapter to the United States of America or to any of its departments, agencies or instrumentalities upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon, and the department is specifically authorized to enter into any such agreements, terms and conditions required by the United States of America or any of its departments, agencies or instrumentalities as a condition to the purchase of such debentures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.9.

Warrants for the payments to be made on account of the debentures either as to principal, interest, premium, or otherwise, shall be duly drawn by the State Controller, upon the request of the State Treasurer, whenever the drawing of such warrants is required in order to make such payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.10.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this chapter, the proceeds received from the sale of debentures and any revenues received by the department from pledged contracts entered into by the department may be used to defray any expenses incurred by the department or the State Treasurer in connection with and incidental to the issuance and sale of debentures including expenses for preparation, inspections and examinations, surveys and reports, which may be required by the purchasers of debentures, and any legal opinions deemed necessary or advisable by the department in connection with the issuance of debentures except that the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such debentures may contain appropriate provisions governing the use and application of the proceeds from the sale of the debentures or other revenues received by the department for the purposes above specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.11.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to carry out the objects and purposes and the declared public policy of the State of California as in this chapter set forth. The facts with which the Legislature is fully cognizant are:

The State of California is committed to aid and assist veterans under the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974. Increasing numbers of servicemen who served in Vietnam are being discharged and need home loans. The Cal-Vet loan program must be updated to provide comparable benefits to those provided veterans of World War II and the Korean Conflict. Conditions in the money market render it impracticable for the State of California in conformity with its other commitments to continue to raise funds for veterans’ aid through the issuance and sale of general obligation bonds of the state. There is now in the Department of Veterans Affairs a backlog of applications which cannot be processed because funds are inadequate to meet the demand for loans. This act provides another method whereby the State of California will be able to raise the necessary funds for the aid and assistance of veterans through the issuance of revenue debentures payable exclusively from the proceeds of contracts of sale of properties acquired by the department from veterans’ revenue debenture proceeds and resold to veterans without imposing any liability upon the State of California and without creating any debt or liability of the State of California. The urgent requirements of veterans and the necessity of raising funds immediately for their aid and assistance render it essential that this law be adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.12.

If any section, subdivision, sentence, clause or phrase of this chapter is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid or unenforceable, such decision shall not affect the validity or enforceability of the remaining portions of the chapter. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this chapter and each section, subdivision, sentence, clause and phrase hereof irrespective of the fact that any one or more sections, subdivisions, sentences, clauses and phrases may be declared unconstitutional, invalid or unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.13.

This chapter shall not operate to rescind or repeal any act of the State of California now or hereafter enacted providing for the issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of California for the purpose of financing the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 or for purposes similar to those set forth in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 provided such bonds are either payable out of the General Fund of the State of California or the full faith and credit of said state is pledged for the payment of both the principal of and interest thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.14.

All money in any of the funds created or authorized to be created in any resolution of issuance under the provisions of this chapter is hereby appropriated for expenditure in carrying out the purposes herein and therein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.15.

The purchaser shall make an initial payment of at least 10 percent of the selling price of the property, in case of a farm, and 5 percent in the case of a home. The department may waive the initial payment in any case where the value of the property as determined by the department appraisal shall be equal to the amount to be paid by the department plus at least 10 percent in the case of a farm, and 5 percent in the case of a home. The balance of the purchase price may be amortized over a period fixed by the department, not exceeding 40 years, together with interest thereon at the rate as determined by the department for such amortization purposes. The department shall establish the actual interest rate to be paid. To this end the department, by two-thirds vote of the California Veterans Board, with the approval of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee established by Section 1000.3 of this code, is empowered to establish a uniform rate of interest payable upon the amount remaining unpaid under all pledged veterans’ purchase contracts then or thereafter executed. The California Veterans Board and the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee shall periodically at least once each year make a finding as to the rate of interest to be charged, taking into consideration the requirements of the Veterans’ Debenture Revenue Fund created by this chapter, but subject to any covenant contained in any resolution of issuance adopted in accordance with this chapter pursuant to which debentures are at the time outstanding. Subject to any such covenant, the department may raise or lower the rate of interest payable under such contracts for any given period as many times and as frequently as it deems to be for the best interests of the department, if in so doing its action is made applicable alike to any and all pledged contract holders and 30 days’ advance notice is given of the time when the new rate of interest is to become effective. Upon demand of the Veterans’ Debenture Finance Committee, given as provided in any resolution of issuance adopted pursuant to this chapter, the department shall increase the rate of interest to be charged upon the amount remaining unpaid upon all pledged veterans’ purchase contracts then in existence. A change in the interest rate may affect the total amount of any installment payment. The purchaser on any installment date may pay any or all installments still remaining unpaid. Subject to any covenant contained in any resolution of issuance adopted in accordance with this chapter, and pursuant to which debentures are at the time outstanding, the department may, in any individual case, for good cause postpone from time to time, upon such terms as the department deems proper, the payment of the whole or any part of any installment of the purchase price or interest thereon.

This section is intended to be applicable to all lands acquired from the proceeds of the sale of debentures issued hereunder and to the resale and disposition of such lands to the purchasers thereof and no other provision of law shall be applicable to the purchase or resale of such lands except only as in this act provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1488.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.16.

The department shall require that all applicants under this article qualify under the applicable federal laws and regulations governing the permitted uses of tax-exempt bond funds, and file within the time limits required under applicable federal laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1066, Sec. 10.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Veteran Farmers or Ranchers [1008. - 1008.5.]

1008.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Agriculture is a major industry in California, with 81,700 farms and ranches. California agriculture is nearly a thirty-seven-billion-five-hundred-million-dollar ($37,500,000,000) industry that generates one hundred billion dollars ($100,000,000,000) in related economic activity.

(b) In 2010, the United States Department of Agriculture Secretary cited that the aging of principal farm operators across the nation is rising. The USDA Census of Agriculture, 2012 Census Highlights, finds that the average age of America’s principal farm operators is 58.3 years of age and one-third are
 65 years or older.

(c) An 8-percent national decrease in the number of farmers and ranchers is expected to occur between the years 2008 and 2018.

(d) Recognizing the growth of America’s food production needs, and low proportions of beginning farmers and ranchers nationwide, the USDA Secretary identified America’s returning military veterans as a promising population to enter careers as farmers and ranchers. The 2014 United States Farm Bill contains various landmark incentives to assist military veterans and disadvantaged populations to become farmers and ranchers.

(e) In November 2014, the USDA announced the designation of the nation’s first USDA Military Veterans Agricultural Liaison to coordinate information,
 resources, and support for active duty military and veterans interested in entering careers as farmers and ranchers.

(f) The 2014 United States Farm Bill, also known as the Agricultural Act of 2014, contained various incentives designed to assist the nation’s returning military veterans to acquire skills needed to start and manage a farm. Incentives include, but are not limited to, farm loans and microloans, education and training and technical assistance, including training in natural resource conservation techniques and practices.

(g) Eight percent of the nation’s homeless population are military veterans and 45 percent of homeless veterans are African American or Latino, while less than 10 percent are women.

(h) More than six million veterans reside in rural America and approximately two million veterans are residents of California.

(i) California veterans use fewer benefits than their peers at the national level. While all veterans report only partial awareness of benefits for which they are eligible, some states have more advanced outreach programs to connect veterans to these available resources.

(j) The Legislature recognizes the opportunities to the state through landmark funding contained in the 2014 United States Farm Bill and subsequent United States Farm bills to assist military veterans in entering careers as farmers and ranchers.

(k) The Legislature acknowledges opportunities offered through a state and
 federal partnership to strengthen and enhance these resources to benefit California’s veterans and historically underserved populations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   (AB 376)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1008.5.

(a) By July 1, 2018, the California Labor and Workforce Development Agency, the California Department of Veterans Affairs, and the California Department of Food and Agriculture, in consultation with the United States Department of Agriculture and the United States Farm Service Agency, and other federal agencies as needed, shall identify and
 post information pursuant to this section on their individual Internet Web sites as appropriate to assist, educate, train, and otherwise support California’s transitioning service members and returning military veterans to enter into farming or ranching careers in California.

(b) Information posted by the Department of Food and Agriculture pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but is not limited to, information on all of the
 following:

(1) The California Department of Food and Agriculture’s Healthy Soils Initiative.

(2) The 2014 United States Agricultural Act and subsequent agricultural acts.

(3) Farm loans offered through the United States Department of Agriculture’s Farm Service Agency.

(4) The United States Department of Agriculture’s Natural Resources Conservation Service.

(5) The federal Beginning Farmer and Rancher Development Program.

(c) Information posted by the Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but is not limited to, information on the California Department of Veterans Affairs’ Farm and Home Loan Program and federal farm and home loan programs, as appropriate.

(d) Information posted by the Labor and Workforce Development Agency pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but is not limited to, information on training and employment services offered through the America’s Job Center of California, operating under the California Labor and Workforce Development Agency.
 It is the intent of the Legislature that the employment and training assistance provided through the America’s Job Center of California to military veterans seeking careers as farm operators and ranchers shall be in the same manner as the assistance provided to other career seekers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   (AB 376)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. VETERANS' INSTITUTIONS [1010. - 1121.]



CHAPTER 1. Veterans’ Home of California [1010. - 1052.]

1010.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Home” means any facility operated by the department for the provision of long-term care, assisted living, adult day health, independent living, or other health care services to eligible veterans. The Veterans’ Home of California system is comprised of the following subsidiary home locations:

(1) The Veterans’ Home of California, Yountville, in Napa County.

(2) The Veterans’ Home of California, Barstow, in San Bernardino County.

(3) The Veterans’ Home of California, Chula Vista, in San Diego County.

(4) The Veterans’ Home of California, West Los Angeles, in Los Angeles County.

(5) The Veterans’ Home of California, Lancaster, in Los Angeles County.

(6) The Veterans’ Home of California, Ventura, in Ventura County.

(7) The Veterans’ Home of California, Fresno, in Fresno County.

(8) The Veterans’ Home of California, Redding, in Shasta County.

(b) “Administrator” means the senior executive appointed to operate a home.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Member” means a veteran or nonveteran spouse or domestic partner who
 has been admitted to residency at a veterans’ home.

(e) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Veterans Affairs.

(f) “Veteran” has the same meaning as defined in Section 101(2) of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(g) “Applicant” means an eligible veteran or nonveteran spouse or domestic partner who is applying for admission to a home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   (SB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1011.

(a) There is in the department a Veterans’ Home of California system, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1010.

(b) There shall be an administrator for each home or homesite in that system, who shall be recommended by the Secretary of Veterans Affairs and appointed by the Governor, and shall be located at that home or homesite. The salary for each administrator shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Human Resources.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 42.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 1012.4, 1023, and 1023.1, the homes are for aged or disabled persons who served in the Armed Forces of the United States of America who were discharged or released from active duty under conditions other than dishonorable, who are eligible for health care benefits, hospitalization, or domiciliary care in a veterans’ facility in accordance with the rules and regulations of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and who are bona fide residents of this state at the time of application; and for the spouses or domestic partners of these persons if all of the following conditions, as are
 applicable, are satisfied:

(1) Space is available.

(2) The veteran and the spouse or domestic partner will maintain joint residency in accordance with rules established by the department.

(3) The spouse or domestic partner is a bona fide resident of this state at the time of application for admission to the home and either is married to, and has resided with, the veteran applicant for at least one
 year, or is the surviving spouse or domestic partner of a recipient of the Medal of Honor or a former prisoner of war (POW).

(b) (1) Veterans who qualify for benefits under this chapter who are recipients of the Medal of Honor or who were
 POWs shall be given priority over all other qualified veterans.

(2) Veterans who qualify for benefits under this chapter who have been rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as being 70 percent or greater service-connected disabled may be given priority over other
 veterans who do not qualify for prioritization under paragraph (1).

(3) The secretary may establish needs-based criteria for admission to the homes, and any veteran meeting those criteria may be given priority over veterans who do not qualify for prioritization under paragraph (1) or (2) and can afford to provide for their own care elsewhere.

(4) Paragraphs
 (2) and (3) shall not apply to veterans who, as of January 1, 2018, are on a wait list awaiting admission to a home.

(5) Veterans who qualify for benefits under this chapter due to service during a time of war may be given priority over veterans who qualify due to service during a time of peace.

(c) A member spouse or domestic partner may continue
 residency after the veteran’s death so long as they continue to pay all applicable fees.

(d) The property of the home shall be used for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 140, Sec. 2.   (SB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.1.

(a) Prior to the admission of an applicant, and at any time during which a person is a member of a home, the department may investigate an applicant’s or member’s financial status or
 criminal
 background to determine the applicant’s or member’s income, assets, and suitability for residency at a home, or to ensure that the applicant or member is unable to pay for necessary hospital or domiciliary care outside of the home. The department may contract with any other state, federal, or private agency to conduct the investigation
 on its behalf.

(b) Omitting or falsifying financial, criminal, medical, or other information by an applicant or member or nonpayment of fees may be grounds for financial penalties or denial of admission to, or discharge from, a home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 140, Sec. 3.   (SB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any member of the home who is receiving an aid and attendance allowance from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for the member’s own care shall pay to the home an amount equal to that allowance in all levels of care excluding domiciliary.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a member of a home who is in intermediate care or skilled nursing care and has a disability that has been rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as being 70 percent or more service-connected, as determined under Part 4 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 123.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.3.

(a) Members of a home, including members who are nonveteran spouses or domestic partners, shall pay fees as determined by the department to cover room and board and other expenses defined in regulations, except that the total of the individual member’s fees for any fiscal year shall not be greater than as set forth in the following schedule:

(1) Forty-seven and one-half percent of the member’s annual income for domiciliary care.

(2) Fifty-five percent of the member’s annual income for residential care for the elderly or assisted living.

(3) Sixty-five percent of the member’s annual income for intermediate care.

(4) Seventy percent of the member’s annual income for skilled nursing care.
